Missouri, session 2026, HB3275.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 164.011, 165.011, and 165.051, RSMo, are repealed and three
new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 164.011, 165.011, and 165.051,
to read as follows:
164.011. 1. The school board of each district annually shall prepare an estimate of the
amount of money to be raised by taxation for the ensuing school year, the rate required to
produce the amount, and the rate necessary to sustain the school or schools of the district for
the ensuing school year, to meet principal and interest payments on the bonded debt of the
district and to provide the funds to meet other legitimate district purposes. In preparing the
estimate, the board shall have sole authority in determining what part of the total authorized
rate shall be used to provide revenue for each of the funds as authorized by section 165.011.
Prior to setting tax rates for the teachers' and incidental funds, the school board of each school
district annually shall set the tax rate for the capital projects fund as necessary to meet the
expenditures of the capital projects fund after all transfers allowed pursuant to subsection [4]
5of section 165.011. Furthermore the tax rate set in the capital projects fund shall not require
the reduction of the equalized combined tax rates for the teachers' and incidental funds to be
less than the greater of the minimum operating levy for the current year for school purposes
established under subsection 2 of section 163.021.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3275 2
2. The school board of each district shall forward the estimate to the county clerk on
or before September first. In school districts divided by county lines, the estimate shall be
forwarded to the proper officer of each county in which any part of the district lies.
3. When revising its tax rate each year, the aggregate increase in the valuation of
property assessed by the state tax commission for the current year over that of the previous
year shall be considered new construction and improvement.
4. The department of elementary and secondary education and any other government
agency involved in the tax rate process shall update the necessary forms, reports, and
documents in order to implement the provisions of this section.
165.011. 1. (1) The following funds are created for the accounting of all school
moneys: "Teachers' Fund", "Incidental Fund", "Capital Projects Fund" and "Debt Service
Fund". The treasurer of the school district shall open an account for each fund specified in
this section[, and].
(2) All moneys received from the county school fund and all moneys derived from
taxation for teachers' wages shall be placed to the credit of the teachers' fund.
(3) All tuition fees, state moneys received under section 163.031, and all other
moneys received from the state except as herein provided shall be placed to the credit of the
teachers' and incidental funds at the discretion of the district board of education, except as
provided in subsection 5 of section 163.031.
(4) Money received from other districts for transportation and money derived from
taxation for incidental expenses shall be credited to the incidental fund.
(5) All money derived from taxation or received from any other source for the
erection of buildings or additions thereto and the remodeling or reconstruction of buildings
and the furnishing thereof, for the payment of lease-purchase obligations, for the purchase of
real estate, or from sale of real estate, schoolhouses or other buildings of any kind, or school
furniture, from insurance, from sale of bonds other than refunding bonds shall be placed to the
credit of the capital projects fund.
(6) All moneys derived from the sale or lease of sites, buildings, facilities,
furnishings, and equipment by a school district as authorized under section 177.088 shall be
credited to the capital projects fund.
(7) Money derived from taxation for the retirement of bonds and the payment of
interest thereon shall be credited to the debt service fund, which shall be maintained as a
separate bank account.
(8) Receipts from delinquent taxes shall be allocated to the several funds on the same
basis as receipts from current taxes, except that where the previous years' obligations of the
district would be affected by such distribution, the delinquent taxes shall be distributed
according to the tax levies made for the years in which the obligations were incurred.

HB 3275 3
(9) All refunds received shall be placed to the credit of the fund from which the
original expenditures were made.
(10) Money donated to the school districts shall be placed to the credit of the fund
where it can be expended to meet the purpose for which it was donated and accepted.
(11) Money received from any other source whatsoever shall be placed to the credit of
the fund or funds designated by the board.
2. (1) The school board may transfer any portion of the unrestricted balance
remaining in the incidental fund to the teachers' fund.
(2) Any district that uses an incidental fund transfer to pay for more than twenty-five
percent of the annual certificated compensation obligation of the district and has an incidental
fund balance on June thirtieth in any year in excess of fifty percent of the combined incidental
teachers' fund expenditures for the fiscal year just ended shall be required to transfer the
excess from the incidental fund to the teachers' fund.
(3) If a balance remains in the debt service fund, after the total outstanding
indebtedness for which the fund was levied is paid, the board may transfer the unexpended
balance to the [capital projects fund] teachers' fund.
(4) If a balance remains in the bond proceeds after completion of the project for
which the bonds were issued, the balance shall be transferred from the incidental or capital
projects fund to the debt service fund.
(5) After making all placements of interest otherwise provided by law, a school
district may transfer from the capital projects fund to the [incidental] teachers' fund the
interest earned from undesignated balances in the capital projects fund.
3. A school district may borrow from one of the following funds: teachers' fund,
incidental fund, or capital projects fund, as necessary to meet obligations in another of those
funds; provided that the full amount is repaid to the lending fund within the same fiscal year.
[3.] 4. Tuition shall be paid from either the teachers' or incidental funds. Employee
benefits for certificated staff shall be paid from the teachers' fund.
[4.] 5. (1) Other provisions of law to the contrary notwithstanding, the school board
of a school district that meets the provisions of subsection 5 of section 163.031 may transfer
from the incidental fund to the capital projects fund the sum of:
[(1)] (a) The amount to be expended for transportation equipment that is considered
an allowable cost under state board of education rules for transportation reimbursements
during the current year; plus
[(2)] (b) Any amount necessary to satisfy obligations of the capital projects fund for
state-approved area vocational-technical schools; plus
[(3)] (c) Current year obligations for lease-purchase obligations entered into prior to
January 1, 1997; plus

HB 3275 4
[(4)] (d) The amount necessary to repay costs of one or more guaranteed energy
savings performance contracts to renovate buildings in the school district, provided that the
contract is only for energy conservation measures as defined in section 640.651 and provided
that the contract specifies that no payment or total of payments shall be required from the
school district until at least an equal total amount of energy and energy-related operating
savings and payments from the vendor pursuant to the contract have been realized by the
school district; plus
[(5)] (e) An amount not to exceed the greater of:
[(a)] a. One hundred sixty-two thousand three hundred twenty-six dollars; or
[(b)] b. Seven percent of the state adequacy target multiplied by the district's
weighted average daily attendance[,].

[provided that]
(2) Transfer amounts in excess of ten percent of the current year obligations of the
capital projects fund authorized under this [subdivision] subsection may be transferred only
by a resolution of the school board approved by a majority of the board members in office
when the resolution is voted on and identifying the specific capital projects to be funded
directly by the district by the transferred funds and an estimated expenditure date, which
shall be within one fiscal year.
[5.] 6. Beginning in the 2006-07 school year, a district meeting the provisions of
subsection 5 of section 163.031 and not making the transfer under paragraph (e) of
subdivision [(5)] (1) of subsection [4] 5 of this section, nor making payments or expenditures
related to obligations made under section 177.088 may transfer from the incidental fund to the
debt service fund or the capital projects fund the greater of:
(1) The state aid received in the 2005-06 school year as a result of no more than
eighteen cents of the sum of the debt service and capital projects levy used in the foundation
formula and placed in the respective debt service or capital projects fund, whichever fund had
the designated tax levy; or
(2) Five percent of the state adequacy target multiplied by the district's weighted
average daily attendance.
[6.] 7. Beginning in the 2006-07 school year, the department of elementary and
secondary education shall deduct from a school district's state aid calculated pursuant to
section 163.031 an amount equal to the amount of any transfer of funds from the incidental
fund to the capital projects fund or debt service fund performed during the previous year in
100 violation of this section; except that the state aid shall be deducted over no more than five
101 school years following the school year of an unlawful transfer based on a plan from the
102 district approved by the commissioner of elementary and secondary education.

HB 3275 5
103 [7.] 8. (1) A school district may transfer unrestricted funds from the capital projects
104 fund to the incidental fund in any year to avoid becoming financially stressed as defined in
105 subsection 1 of section 161.520.
106 (2) If on June thirtieth of any fiscal year the sum of unrestricted balances in a school
107 district's incidental fund and teacher's fund is less than twenty percent of the sum of the
108 school district's expenditures from those funds for the fiscal year ending on that June thirtieth,
109 the school district may, during the next succeeding fiscal year, transfer to its incidental fund
110 an amount up to and including the amount of the unrestricted balance in its capital projects
111 fund on that June thirtieth.
112 (3) For purposes of this subsection, in addition to any other restrictions that may
113 apply to funds in the school district's capital projects fund, any funds that are derived from the
114 proceeds of one or more general obligation bond issues shall be considered restricted funds
115 and shall not be transferred to the school district's incidental fund.
116 9. Beginning in the 2027-28 school year and in all subsequent school years:
117 (1) All interest earned from balances in the teachers' fund, incidental fund,
118 capital projects fund, and debt service fund created under subsection 1 of this section
119 shall be used to supplement, not supplant, moneys used for teacher salaries to the extent
120 that such interest is not otherwise obligated by other provisions of state law; and
121 (2) The capital projects fund shall be capped at a maximum of ten percent of
122 undesignated balances with any undesignated balances over ten percent to be
123 transferred at the beginning of the fiscal year to the teachers' fund, which shall be
124 used to supplement, not supplant, moneys used for teacher salaries.
165.051. If any school district has money in the teachers', incidental, capital projects
or debt service fund not needed within a reasonable period of time for the purpose for which
the money was received, the school board in the district, if it deems it advisable, may invest
the funds in either open time deposits or certificates of deposit secured under the provisions of
sections 110.010 and 110.020; or in bonds, redeemable at maturity at par, of the state of
Missouri, of the United States, or of any wholly owned corporation of the United States; or in
other short term obligations of the United States, or in any instrument permitted by law for the
investment of state moneys. No open time deposits shall be made or bonds purchased to
mature beyond the date that the funds are needed for the purpose for which they were
received by the school district. Interest accruing from the investment of the surplus funds in
such deposits or bonds shall be credited to the teachers' fund [from which the money was
invested] and shall be used to supplement, not supplant, moneys used for teacher salaries
to the extent that such interest is not otherwise obligated by other provisions of state
law.

HB 3275 6
Section B. The repeal and reenactment of sections 164.011, 165.011, and 165.051 of
this act shall become effective upon July 1, 2027.
✔